North Carolina, session 2025, SB995.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS
SECTION 1. The General Assembly finds that:
(1) For years, North Carolina Republicans have controlled the General Assembly
and had every opportunity to invest in the men and women who keep our
communities safe and they have failed to do so.
(2) As a direct result of Republican inaction, North Carolina is experiencing a
severe public safety staffing crisis. Law enforcement agencies across North
Carolina are struggling to recruit and retain qualified officers due to
non-competitive pay, leading to dangerous understaffing in communities
statewide.
(3) North Carolina law enforcement officers and correctional officers are among
the lowest-paid in the region, lagging behind neighboring states, including
Virginia, South Carolina, Georgia, and Tennessee.
(4) High turnover and chronic understaffing compromise public safety and place
enormous strain on the officers who remain, contributing to burnout, mental
health challenges, and increased risk of on-the-job injury.
(5) The General Assembly has a responsibility to correct these Republican
failures, to invest in public safety, and to ensure North Carolina can recruit.

LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER PAY INCREASES
SECTION 2.(a) Effective July 1, 2026, the annual salary of each sworn law
enforcement officer employed by the State of North Carolina shall be increased by seven
thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500).
SECTION 2.(b) The Office of State Human Resources shall establish a competitive
salary schedule for law enforcement officers that accounts for years of service, rank, and regional
cost-of-living and shall update this schedule not less than every two years. At minimum, the
entry-level salary for a State Highway Patrol trooper shall be no less than sixty-two thousand five
hundred dollars ($62,500) per year.
*S995-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(c) The Department of State Treasurer, in consultation with the Office
of State Budget and Management, shall make available to counties and municipalities a grant
program to assist local governments in providing comparable pay increases to locally employed
law enforcement officers.
SECTION 2.(d) For purposes of this section, "law enforcement officer" has the same
meaning as "criminal justice officer," as defined in G.S. 17C-2, and includes sheriffs' deputies
and municipal police officers.

CORRECTIONAL OFFICER PAY INCREASES
SECTION 3.(a) Effective July 1, 2026, the minimum starting salary for a
correctional officer employed by the Department of Adult Correction shall be forty-five thousand
dollars ($45,000) per year. All currently employed correctional officers shall receive an annual
salary increase of eight thousand dollars ($8,000), effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.(b) The Secretary of Adult Correction shall develop a retention
incentive program that provides:
(1) A retention bonus of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each
correctional officer who completes five years of service.
(2) A retention bonus of five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each correctional
officer who completes 10 years of service.
(3) Enhanced hazard pay of three thousand dollars ($3,000) per year for officers
assigned to facilities operating at or below seventy percent (70%) of
authorized staffing levels.
SECTION 3.(c) The Department of Adult Correction shall report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety on vacancy rates and staffing
levels quarterly, beginning October 1, 2026.

MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES FOR PUBLIC SAFETY PERSONNEL
SECTION 4.(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Law enforcement officers and correctional officers experience
disproportionately high rates of posttraumatic stress, depression, anxiety, and
suicide compared to the general population.
(2) Stigma and lack of access to confidential services remain significant barriers
to officers seeking mental health treatment.
(3) Addressing officer mental health is inseparable from addressing officer
retention and public safety outcomes.
SECTION 4.(b) The State Health Plan, in coordination with the Department of
Health and Human Services and the Department of Adult Correction, shall:
(1) Ensure that all law enforcement officers and correctional officers covered
under the State Health Plan have access to a minimum of 12 confidential
mental health visits per year at no cost to the officer, with confidentiality
protections that prevent disclosure to supervisors or employing agencies.
(2) Maintain a dedicated, 24-hour mental health crisis line staffed by clinicians
with training specific to public safety personnel.
SECTION 4.(c) The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Adult
Correction shall each establish a peer support program that does the following:
(1) Trains and certifies peer support officers in evidence-based mental health first
aid and crisis intervention;
(2) Provides peer support officers with appropriate protected leave to perform
peer support duties; and
(3) Partners with The University of North Carolina System and the Community
College System to develop and deliver peer support training curricula.
Page 2 Senate Bill 995-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4.(d) Beginning January 1, 2028, and then annually thereafter, the
Department of Public Safety and the Department of Adult Correction shall each report annually
to the General Assembly on:
(1) The number of officers utilizing mental health services;
(2) Officer suicide rates and trends;
(3) Retention and vacancy data correlated with mental health programs; and
(4) Recommendations for program improvements.

APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 5. To fund the compensation increases awarded in this act and to carry
out the other purposes of this act, the following funds are appropriated, effective July 1, 2026:
(1) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State Budget and
Management the sum of thirty-three million one hundred thousand dollars
($33,100,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to fund a State
law enforcement officer pay raise of seven thousand five hundred dollars
($7,500).
(2) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Adult
Correction the sum of ninety-three million one hundred thousand dollars
($93,100,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to fund
correctional officer pay raises of eight thousand dollars ($8,000) and other
compression adjustments.
(3) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Public
Safety the sum of eight million nine hundred thousand dollars ($8,900,000) in
recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to fund correctional officer pay
raises of eight thousand dollars ($8,000) and other compression adjustments.
(4) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Adult
Correction the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000)
in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to fund retention bonuses.
(5) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Adult
Correction the sum of nine million one hundred thousand dollars ($9,100,000)
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for hazard pay.
(6) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of the State
Treasurer the sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in the
2026-2027 fiscal year for the LEO Local Government Grant Program.
(7) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the State Health Plan the sum
of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to fund the
mental health services expansion of 12 visits per year as provided by this act.
(8) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Public
Safety the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in the 2026-2027 fiscal
year for peer support programs as provided by this act.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Senate Bill 995-First Edition Page 3